Washington statutes.
RCW 43.158.200

Miscellaneous.

(1) Nothing in this chapter:

(a) Prohibits an applicant, a project proponent, a state agency, a local government, or a federally recognized Indian tribe from entering into a nondisclosure agreement to protect confidential business information, trade secrets, financial information, or other proprietary information;

(b) Limits or affects other statutory provisions specific to any state agency related to that agency's procedures and protocols related to the identification, designation, or disclosure of information identified as confidential business information, trade secrets, financial information, or other proprietary information;

(c) Limits or affects the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW as they apply to information or nondisclosure agreements obtained by a state agency under this chapter; or

(d) Relieves the responsible official under chapter 43.21C RCW for an action of the official's responsibilities under that chapter.

(2) The decisions by the department of commerce to designate a clean energy project of statewide significance must be made available to the public. Regardless of any exemptions otherwise set forth in RCW 42.56.270, publicly shared information must include the designee's name, a brief description of the project, the intended project location, a description of climate and economic development benefits to the state and communities therein, a tribal engagement plan, a community engagement plan, and a community benefit agreement if applicable.

(3) The department of commerce may terminate a designation of a clean energy project of statewide significance for reasons that include, but are not limited to, failure to comply with requirements of the designation or the emergence of new information that significantly alters the department of commerce's assessment of the applicant's application, project, or project proponent. The department of commerce must notify the applicant, project proponent, and the department of ecology of the termination in writing within 30 days.

(4) Nothing in this chapter affects the jurisdiction of the energy facility site evaluation council under chapter 80.50 RCW.

(5) This chapter does not limit or abridge the powers and duties granted to a participating permit agency under the law or laws that authorizes or requires the agency to issue a permit for a project. Each participating permit agency retains its authority to make all decisions on all substantive matters with regard to the respective component permit that is within its scope of its responsibility including, but not limited to, the determination of permit application completeness, permit approval or approval with conditions, or permit denial.

[ 2023 c 230 s 210.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 230: See note following RCW 43.394.010.